Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-393
Insurance laws; violations; reports confidential.

Every insurance company, agent, solicitor, or broker, and every person or party having knowledge of violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, is required to promptly report the facts and circumstances pertaining thereto to the Department of Insurance, which report and the name of the informant may be held confidential by the department, its officers, assistants and employees, and not be made public.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 62, p. 422;

R.S.1913, § 3198;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 32, p. 602;

C.S.1922, § 7797;

C.S.1929, § 44-332;

R.S.1943, § 44-393.